Alaska, session 34, HB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that 07 (1) on October 9, 2025, the governor declared a disaster emergency, following 08 the 2025 West Coast Storm; 09 (2) the condition of the disaster emergency was extended in November of 10 2025, December of 2025, and January of 2026, with the disaster emergency expiring on 11 February 6, 2026; 12 (3) the effects of the storm remains severe, and infrastructure systems from the 13 original storm, as well as ongoing emergency actions, are necessary to respond to those 14 effects; 01 (4) under AS 26.23.020(c), "[a] proclamation of disaster emergency may not 02 remain in effect longer than 30 days unless extended by the legislature by a concurrent 03 resolution"; and 04 (5) an additional extension will allow agencies to continue the agencies' 05 emergency response to meet the disaster. 06 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 WEST COAST STORM DISASTER EMERGENCY: APPROVAL, 09 RATIFICATION, AND EXTENSION OF DISASTER EMERGENCY. (a) The declarations 10 of a disaster emergency for the 2025 West Coast Storm issued by the governor in November 11 of 2025, December of 2025, and January of 2026, are approved and ratified. 12 (b) Under AS 26.23.020(c), the Alaska State Legislature extends the October 9, 2025, 13 disaster emergency declared by the governor for the 2025 West Coast Storm until March 8, 14 2026. 15 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 16 read: 17 RETROACTIVITY. Section 2(b) of this Act is retroactive to February 6, 2026. 18 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.